Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6328.02
Existing rules, regulations, licenses, certificates, forms of approval, suits, other proceedings; how treated.

(1) All rules and regulations adopted prior to December 1, 2008, under the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Certification Act shall continue to be effective under the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Practice Act to the extent not in conflict with the changes made by Laws 2007, LB 463.

(2) All licenses, certificates, or other forms of approval issued prior to December 1, 2008, in accordance with the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Certification Act shall remain valid as issued for purposes of the changes made by Laws 2007, LB 463, in the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Practice Act unless revoked or otherwise terminated by law.

(3) Any suit, action, or other proceeding, judicial or administrative, which was lawfully commenced prior to December 1, 2008, under the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Certification Act shall be subject to the provisions of the act as they existed prior to December 1, 2008.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1285.